third_party/liblouis/src/tables/ur-pk-g2.ctb
# Dot 56 Signs
always \x0645\x0646\x062F 56-145                                           MND                 ;D
endword \x06AF\x0627\x0631 56-1235                                         GAR                 ;R
always \x062E\x06CC\x0632 56-1356                                          XIZ                 ;Z
# always \x06CC\x0646\x06AF 56-1245                                          ING                 ;G          Correct but advised to ignore
always \x0646\x06D2\x0020\x0648\x0627\x0644 56-123                         NI WAL              ;L
always \x0646\x06D2\x0648\x0627\x0644 56-123                               NIWAL               ;L
always \x0648\x0626\x06CC 56-24                                            W'I                 ;I
noback always \x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC 56-24                               W'I                 ;I
always \x0648\x0626\x06D2 56-34                                            W'/                 ;/
noback always \x0648\x064A\x0654\x06D2 56-34                               W'/                 ;/
always \x06CC\x062C\x06CC\x06D2 56-13456                                   IJI/                ;Y
always \x0650\x06CC\x062C\x0626\x06D2 56-13456                             EIJ'/               ;Y
noback always \x0650\x06CC\x062C\x064A\x0654\x06D2 56-13456                EIJ'/               ;Y
# New Ones
always \x062F\x0627\x0634\x062A 56-2345                                    DA%T                ;T
endword \x0641\x0631\x0648\x0634 56-146                                    FRW%                ;%
endword \x0646\x0634\x06CC\x0646 56-1345                                   N%IN                ;N
endword \x062E\x0627\x0646\x0627 56-125                                    XANA                ;H


# Dot 6 Signs
word \x0628\x0644\x06A9\x06C1 6-12                                          BLKH               ,B
word \x0628\x0627\x0648\x062C\x064F\x0648\x062F\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-12-2456 BAWJUWDIKH         ,BW
word \x0628\x0634\x0631\x062A\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-12-146                    B%RTIKH            ,B%
word \x062A\x0627\x06A9\x06C1 6-2345                                        TAKH               ,T
word \x062A\x0627\x0648\x0642\x062A\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-2345-2456           TAWQTIKH           ,TW
word \x0686\x064F\x0648\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-14                              CUWNKH             ,C
word \x062D\x0627\x0644\x0627\x0646\x06A9\x0650 6-156                       :ALANKE            ,:
word \x062D\x0627\x0644\x0627\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-156                       :ALANKH            ,:
word \x06D2\x062A\x0651\x0627\x06A9\x0650 6-156-2345                        :T,AKE             ,:T
word \x06A9\x06CC\x064F\x0648\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-13                        KIUWNKH            ,K
word \x06A9\x06CC\x0648\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-13                              KIWNKH             ,K
word \x063A\x0631\x0636\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-126                             <R$IKH             ,<


# Dot 46 Signs - all "New Ones"
always \x067E\x0631\x0633\x062A 46-2345                                     PRST               .T
endword \x0628\x0627\x062F 46-145                                           BAD                .D
endword \x06AF\x06CC\x0631 46-1235                                          GIR                .R
endword \x0627\x0646\x06AF\x06CC\x0632 46-1356                              ANGIZ              .Z
endword \x0627\x0646\x062F\x06CC\x0634 46-146                               ANDI%              .%
endword \x062A\x0631\x06CC\x0646 46-1345                                    TRIN               .N
endword \x06AF\x0627\x06C1 46-125                                           GAH                .H
noback endword \x0650\x06AF\x0627\x06C1 46-125                              EGAH               .H
endword \s\x06AF\x0627\x06C1 46-125                                         [space]GAH         .H
word \x0646\x0650\x06AF\x0627\x06C1 1345-46-125                             NEGAH              N.H
noback word \x0646\x0650\x06AF\x0627\x06C1 1345-46-125                      NGAH               N.H


# Words beginning HW or HUW
always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x0626\x06CC 125-56-24                            HUW'I               H;I
noback always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x0626\x0650\x06CC 125-56-24               HUW'I               H;I
noback always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC 125-56-24               HUW'I               H;I
always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x0626\x06D2 125-56-34                            HUW'/               H;/
noback always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06D2 125-56-34               HUW'/               H;/
always \x06C1\x064F\x0624\x0627 125-2456-1                                 HU'WA               HWA
noback always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x0654\x0627 125-2456-1                    HUW'A               HWA


# Shortforms
word \x0627\x0670\x06CC 1-23                                                A2I                 A2
word \x0627\x06C3\x0651\x0641\x0627\x0642 1-2345-124                        AT,FAQ              ATF
word \x0627\x06C3\x0651\x0641\x0627\x0642\x0627\x06C3 1-2345-124-2345       AT,FAQAT            ATFT
word \x0627\x0686\x0627\x0646\x06A9 1-14                                    ACANK               AC
word \x0627\x06AF\x0631\x0686\x06C1 1-1245-14                               AGRCH               AGC
word \x0627\x0644\x0628\x062A\x0651\x06C1 1-123-12                          ALBT,H              ALB
word \x0627\x0645\x06A9\x0627\x0646 1-134-13                                AMKAN               AMK
word \x0627\x0645\x06A9\x0627\x0646\x0627\x062A 1-134-13-2345               AMKANAT             AMKT
word \x0686\x06BE 16-34                                                     C8                  */
word \x062A\x0628\x06BE\x06CC 2345-23                                       TB8I                T2
word \x062C\x0628\x06BE\x06CC 245-23                                        JB8I                J2
word \x0633\x0628\x06BE\x06CC 234-23                                        SB8I                S2
word \x0639\x0646\x06A9\x0631\x06CC\x0628 12356-1345-13                     (NKRIB              (NK
word \x0639\x0646\x06A9\x0631\x0650\x06CC\x0628 12356-1345-13               (NKREIB             (NK
word \x06A9\x0628\x06BE\x06CC 13-23                                         KB8I                K2
word \x0644\x062D\x0627\x0638 123-156                                       L:A=                L:
word \x0644\x06C1\x0627\x0630\x0627 123-125                                 LHA!A               LH
word \x0645\x0631\x062A\x0628\x06C1 134-1235-2345                           MRTBH               MRT
word \x0645\x0632\x06CC\x062F 134-1356                                      MZID                MZ
word \x0645\x0637\x0627\x0628\x0642 134-23456                               M)ABQ               M)
word \x0645\x064F\x0637\x0627\x0628\x0650\x0642 134-23456                   MU)ABEQ             M)
word \x0645\x064F\x0645\x06A9\x0650\x0646 134-134                           MUMKEN              MM
word \x0645\x064F\x0645\x06A9\x0650\x0646\x0627\x062A 134-135-2345          MUMKENAT            MMT
word \x0645\x0639\x0645\x064F\x0648\x0644 134-12356-134                     M(MUWL              M(M
word \x0645\x0639\x0645\x064F\x0648\x0644\x0627\x062A 134-12356-134         M(MUWLAT            M(MT
word \x0646\x0632\x062F\x06CC\x06A9 1345-1356                               NZDIK               NZ
word \x0648\x062C\x06C1 2456-245                                            WJH                 WJ
word \x0648\x063A\x064E\x06CC\x0631\x06C1 2456-126                          W<1IRH              W<
word \x0648\x063A\x06CC\x0631\x06C1 2456-126                                W<IRH               W<
word \x0648\x0631\x0646\x0627 2456-1235                                     WRNA                WR
word \x0648\x0631\x0646\x06C1 2456-1235                                     WRNH                WR
word \x06CC\x0639\x0646\x06CC 24-12356                                      I(NI                I(
word \x0628\x0627\x0639\x062B 12-1456                                       BA(?                B?
noback word \x0628\x0627\x0639\x0650\x062B 12-1456                          BA(E?               B?
word \x0628\x0639\x0636 12-1246                                             B($                 B$
word \x06C1\x0631\x06AF\x0650\x0632 125-1356                                HRGEZ               HZ
word \x06C1\x0631\x06AF\x0650\x0632 125-1356                                HWGEZ               HZ
word \x06C1\x0645\x06CC\x0634\x06C1 125-125                                 HMI%H               HH
word \x0645\x064F\x0646\x0627\x0633\x0650\x0628 134-12                      MUNASEB             MB
noback word \x0645\x0646\x0627\x0633\x0628 134-12		                    MNASB               MB
noback word \x0645\x0646\x0627\x0633\x0650\x0628 134-12                     MNASEB              MB
word \x067E\x06CC\x0634\x062A\x0631 1234-146                                PI%TR               P%
word \x062F\x06CC\x06AF\x0631 145-1245                                      DIGR                DG
word \x0628\x0631\x0627\x0628\x0631 12-12                                   BRABR               BB
word \x062C\x064F\x0633\x062A\x062C\x064F\x0648 245-245                     JUSTJUW             JJ
word \x0686\x064F\x0646\x0627\x0646\x0686\x06C1 14-14                       CUNANCH             CC
word \x062E\x0648\x0627\x06C1\x0645\x062E\x0648\x0627\x06C1 1346-1346       XWAHMXWAH           XX
word \x0633\x0650\x0644\x0633\x0650\x0644\x06C1 234-234                     SELSELH             SS
word \x06A9\x06CC\x0648\x06BA\x06A9\x0631 13-13                             KIW;KR              KK          as below but wthout space
word \x06A9\x06CC\x0648\x06BA\x0020\x06A9\x0631 13-13                       KIW; KR             KK
word \x06AF\x064F\x0641\x062A\x06AF\x064F\x0648 1245-1245                   GUFTGUW             GG
word \x06AF\x0641\x062A\x06AF\x0648 1245-1245                               GFTGW               GG
word \x06CC\x06A9\x0627\x06CC\x06A9 24-24                                   IKAIK               II
word \x0627\x0628\x0020\x062A\x06A9 1-2345                                  AB TK               AT
word \x062C\x0628\x0020\x062A\x06A9 245-2345                                JB TK               JT
word \x062C\x0650\x0633\x0020\x0637\x0631\x06D2 245-23456                   JES )R:             J)
word \x062C\x0650\x0633\x0020\x0637\x0631\x0641 245-23456-124               JES )RF             J)F
word \x06A9\x0628\x0020\x062A\x06A9 13-2345                                 KB TK               KT
word \x06A9\x0650\x0633\x0020\x0637\x0631\x06D2 13-23456                    KES )R:             K)
word \x06A9\x0650\x0633\x0020\x0637\x0631\x0641 13-23456-124                KES )RF             K)F
word \x062A\x0639\x0627\x0644\x0627 2345-12356                              T(ALA               T(
word \x062A\x0639\x0627\x0644\x06D2\x0670 2345-12356                        T(AL/2              T(
word \x062A\x0639\x0627\x0644\x06CC\x0670 2345-12356                        T(ALI2              T(
word \x062A\x064E\x0639 2345-12356                                          T1(                 T(          removing fatha
word \x0646\x0632\x062F\x0650\x06CC\x06A9 1345-1356                         NZDEIK              NZ
word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x062D\x064F\x0020\x0627\x0644\x0642\x064F\x062F\x0633 1235-12345-234      RUW:U ALQUDS          RQS

# New Ones
word \x0627\x0644\x0020\x062E\x06CC\x0631 1-123-1346                        AL XIR              ALX
word \x0627\x0633\x0020\x0642\x062F\x0631 15-12345                          AS QDR              EQ
word \x06A9\x0633\x0020\x0642\x062F\x0631 13-12345                          KS QDR              KQ
word \x062A\x0645\x0020\x0633\x06D2 2345-234                                TM S/               TS
word \x06C1\x0645\x0020\x0633\x06D2 125-234                                 HM S/               HS
